fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-nîwa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nîwa / -îw- - ok : # -m animate dependent husband's ex	AEW NDA4w
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîwa
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîwa
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nîwinâna
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kîwinawa
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kîwiwâwa

     nîwa+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nîwa
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kîwa
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nîwinâna
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Obv: kîwinawa
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kîwiwâwa

     nîwa+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: wîwa
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: wîwiwâwa
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: wîwiyiwa


     nîwa+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nîwak
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kîwak
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nîwinânak
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kîwinawak
     nîwa+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kîwiwâwak


     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nîwis,     nîwisis]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kîwis,     kîwisis]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nîwisinân, nîwisisinân]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kîwisinaw, kîwisisinaw]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kîwisiwâw, kîwisisiwâw]

     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv:    [wîwisa,     wîwisisa]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv:    [wîwisiwâwa, wîwisisiwâwa]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [wîwisiyiwa, wîwisisiyiwa]

     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nîwisak,     nîwisisak]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kîwisak,     kîwisisak]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nîwisinânak, nîwisisinânak]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kîwisinawak, kîwisisinawak]
     nîwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kîwisiwâwak, kîwisisiwâwak]
